Washington statutes.
RCW 41.04.110

Persons employed by more than one agency—Joint operation—May provide membership in single system.

When there exists a joint operation of a public service, the authorities may make provision for membership of all new employees in one designated retirement system by agreement with the proper authorities.

[ 1951 c 98 s 5.]